Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202658-239
Authority; powers; enumerated.

The authority is hereby granted all powers necessary or appropriate to carry out and effectuate its public and corporate purposes including:

(1) To have perpetual succession as a body politic and corporate and an independent instrumentality exercising essential public functions;

(2) To adopt, amend, and repeal bylaws, rules, and regulations not inconsistent with the Nebraska Investment Finance Authority Act, to regulate its affairs, to carry into effect the powers and purposes of the authority, and to conduct its business;

(3) To sue and be sued in its own name;

(4) To have an official seal and alter it at will;

(5) To maintain an office at such place or places within the state as it may designate;

(6) To make and execute contracts and all other instruments as necessary or convenient for the performance of its duties and the exercise of its powers and functions under the act;

(7) To employ architects, engineers, attorneys, inspectors, accountants, building contractors, financial experts, and such other advisors, consultants, and agents as may be necessary in its judgment and to fix their compensation;

(8) To obtain insurance against any loss in connection with its bonds, property, and other assets in such amounts and from such insurers as it deems advisable;

(9) To borrow money and issue bonds as provided by the act;

(10) To receive and accept from any source aid or contributions of money, property, labor, or other things of value to be held, used, and applied to carry out the purposes of the act subject to the conditions upon which the grants or contributions are made including gifts or grants from any department, agency, or instrumentality of the United States, and to make grants, for any purpose consistent with the act;

(11) To enter into agreements with any department, agency, or instrumentality of the United States or this state and with lenders for the purpose of carrying out projects authorized under the act;

(12) To enter into contracts or agreements with lenders for the servicing and processing of mortgages or loans pursuant to the act;

(13) To provide technical assistance to local public bodies and to for-profit and nonprofit entities in the areas of housing for low-income and moderate-income persons, agricultural enterprises, and community or economic development, to distribute data and information concerning the needs of the state in these areas, and, at the discretion of the authority, to charge reasonable fees for such assistance;

(14) To the extent permitted under its contract with the holders of bonds of the authority, to consent to any modification with respect to the rate of interest, time, and payment of any installment of principal or interest or any other term of any contract, loan, loan note, loan note commitment, mortgage, mortgage loan, mortgage loan commitment, lease, or agreement of any kind to which the authority is a party;

(15) To the extent permitted under its contract with the holders of bonds of the authority, to enter into contracts with any lender containing provisions enabling it to reduce the rental or carrying charges to persons unable to pay the regular schedule of charges when, by reason of other income or payment by any department, agency, or instrumentality of the United States of America or of the state, the reduction can be made without jeopardizing the economic stability of the project being financed;

(16) To acquire by construction, purchase, devise, gift, or lease or any one or more of such methods one or more projects located within this state, except that the authority shall not acquire any projects or parts of such projects by condemnation;

(17) To lease to others any or all of its projects for such rentals and upon such terms and conditions as the authority may deem advisable and as are not in conflict with the act;

(18) To issue bonds for the purpose of paying the cost of financing any project or projects and to secure the payment of such bonds as provided in the act;

(19) To sell and convey any real or personal property and make such order respecting the same as it deems conducive to the best interest of the authority;

(20) To make and undertake commitments to make loans to lenders under the terms and conditions requiring the proceeds of the loans to be used by such lenders to make loans for projects. Loan commitments or actual loans shall be originated through and serviced by any bank, trust company, savings and loan association, mortgage banker, or other financial institution authorized to transact business in the state;

(21) To hold and dispose of any real or personal property, whether tangible or intangible, and any distributions thereon, transferred to or received by the authority as collateral or in payment of amounts due the authority or otherwise pursuant to state law, in accordance with the act;

(22) To invest in, purchase, make commitments to invest in or purchase, and take assignments or make commitments to take assignments of loans made by lenders for the construction, rehabilitation, or purchase of projects;

(23) To enter into financing agreements with others with respect to projects to provide financing for such projects upon such terms and conditions as the authority deems advisable to effectuate the public purposes of the act, which projects shall be located within the state;

(24) To enter into financing agreements with any corporation, partnership, limited liability company, or individual or with any county, city, village, or entity created pursuant to the Interlocal Cooperation Act or the Joint Public Agency Act for purposes of financing any solid waste disposal project;

(25) To enter into agreements with or purchase or guaranty obligations of political subdivisions of the state, including authorities, agencies, commissions, districts, and instrumentalities thereof, to provide financing for affordable housing infrastructure and to enter into financing agreements with private parties for the purpose of financing infrastructure in connection with the development of affordable housing; and

(26) In lieu of providing direct financing as authorized by the Nebraska Investment Finance Authority Act, to guaranty debt obligations of any project owner to whom, and for such purposes as, the authority could otherwise provide direct financing, and the authority may establish a fund or account and limit its obligation on such guaranties to money in such fund or account. Any such guaranty shall contain a statement similar to that required by section 58-255 for bonds issued by the authority.

Laws 1983, LB 626, § 39;

Laws 1986, LB 1230, § 30;

Laws 1991, LB 253, § 40;

Laws 1992, LB 1257, § 70;

Laws 1993, LB 121, § 355;

Laws 1993, LB 364, § 21;

Laws 1996, LB 1322, § 8;

Laws 1999, LB 87, § 79;

Laws 2001, LB 300, § 8;

Laws 2022, LB707, § 40.

Interlocal Cooperation Act, see section 13-801.

Joint Public Agency Act, see section 13-2501.